New York, session 2025-2026, A11691.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The navigation law is amended by adding a new section 40-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 40-c. Life preservers at state-operated marinas, docks, and launch- 4 es. 1. Each marina, dock, and launch owned or operated by the state of 5 New York shall maintain, at each designated area therein, at least one 6 readily accessible life preserver or similar throwable flotation device, 7 such that a person in the water at such location could reasonably access 8 such life preserver or throwable flotation device without traversing to 9 another area of the facility. 10 2. For purposes of this section, the term "designated area" shall mean 11 each discrete mooring slip cluster, fixed pier, floating dock section, 12 or launch point at which vessels are regularly moored, launched, or 13 retrieved. 14 3. The office, in collaboration with the department of environmental 15 conservation, shall administer the provisions of this section. The 16 office may promulgate such rules and regulations as it deems necessary 17 to effectuate the provisions of this section at facilities under its 18 jurisdiction, and the department of environmental conservation may 19 promulgate such rules and regulations as it deems necessary to effectu- 20 ate the provisions of this section at facilities under its jurisdiction. 21 The office and the department of environmental conservation shall coor- 22 dinate to ensure consistent implementation of this section across all 23 state-operated marinas, docks and launches. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 25 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 26 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 27 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 28 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16235-01-6